Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 5 Beer and Wine — Manufacture, Sale, and Transportation Generally
3-5-1704. Purchase — Payment of taxes.

(a)

A consumer must:

(1)

Be physically present at the winery to purchase the vinous liquor to be shipped into or within the state; and

(2)

Provide identification to the winery proving that he or she is twenty-one (21) years of age or older.

(b)(1)

A winery shall collect all sales taxes and excise taxes due on a sale to an individual of this state as if the sale took place on the premises of an Arkansas small farm winery, including without limitation taxes under §§3-5-1605,3-7-104,3-7-111, and3-7-201.

(2)

Taxes collected by the winery shall be submitted to the Department of Finance and Administration as directed without limitation under §§3-5-1605,3-7-104,3-7-111, and3-7-201.

(3)

A winery shall source the collection of sales and use taxes to the purchaser’s delivery address in accordance with §26-52-521(b)(2).

History.

Acts 2013, No. 483, §
1; 2015, No. 236, § 1; 2017, No. 673, §
1.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment deleted former (b)(1)(B); and deleted the (b)(1)(A) designation.

The 2017 amendment added (b)(3).

3-5-1705. Direct shipment.

(a)

A winery shall ship only a vinous liquor to a private residence.

(b)

A winery may only ship one (1) case of vinous liquor per consumer in any calendar quarter.

(c)(1)

A shipment of a vinous liquor shall have a shipping label provided by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division affixed to the shipping package.

(2)

The fee for each label for a shipment shall not exceed ten dollars ($10.00).

History.

Acts 2013, No. 483, §
1.

3-5-1706. Delivery.

A winery shall have the vinous liquor delivered to an Arkansas consumer during the hours of the day that alcoholic beverages may be purchased in the state.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 483, §
1.

3-5-1707. Rules.

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, and any other affected agency of this state may adopt rules to implement this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 483, §
1; 2019, No. 910, § 3328.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director”.

3-5-1708. Disposition of funds.

(a)

Permit fees or taxes, label fees, penalties, fines, proceeds of all forfeitures, special inspection fees, and costs received by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration under this subchapter shall be general revenues and shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund.

(b)

The Treasurer of State shall allocate and transfer those revenues to the various State Treasury funds participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each as provided by and to be used for the respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 483, §
1; 2019, No. 910, § 3329.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a).

3-5-1709. Small farm winery shipment.

(a)(1)

A small farm winery licensee with a wine wholesale permit under §3-5-1602(c)(1)(E) may ship small farm winery wine under this subchapter to a private resident without the private resident having been physically present or having made an in-person purchase at the small farm winery if the shipment includes only small farm winery wine.

(2)

Additional shipping registration of a small farm winery is not required for a shipment under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.

(b)

A private resident shall provide identification to the small farm winery proving that he or she is twenty-one (21) years of age or older.

(c)

A small farm winery may ship only one (1) case of small farm winery wine per private resident in any month.

(d)

A small farm winery shipping under this subchapter shall ensure that all containers of small farm winery wine delivered within this state are conspicuously labeled as follows:

“CONTAINS ALCOHOL: SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGE 21 OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY”.

(e)(1)

A small farm winery shall collect all sales taxes and excise taxes due on a sale to an individual of this state as if the sale took place on the premises of the small farm winery, including without limitation taxes under §§3-5-1605,3-7-104,3-7-111, and3-7-201.

(2)

Taxes collected by the small farm winery shall be submitted to the Department of Finance and Administration as directed without limitation under §§3-5-1605,3-7-104,3-7-111, and3-7-201.

(3)

A small farm winery shall source the collection of sales and use taxes to the purchaser’s delivery address in accordance with §26-52-521(b)(2).

(f)

A small farm winery that makes a direct shipment of small farm winery wine under this section shall maintain records regarding each shipment of small farm winery wine that include the:

(1)

Name and address of the person to whom the small farm winery wine is:

(A)

Sold; and

(B)

Billed; and

(2)

Date of shipment.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 313, §
3; 2017, No. 848, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 848, § 1 specifically amended this section as enacted by Acts 2017, No. 313, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 848 made no change in this section.

3-5-1710. Permits — Drawing — Issuance.

(a)(1)

Within sixty (60) days after April 3, 2017, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall notify by mail all small farm wineries licensed under §3-5-1602 and holding a small farm wine wholesale permit under §3-5-1602(c)(1)(E) issued on or before April 15, 2017, that they are eligible for a small farm winery private-resident shipping permit if the winery produced by fermentation at least eight hundred gallons (800 gals.) of wine in the previous calendar year as shown on the winery's TTB F 5120-17.

(2)

The board shall issue a small farm winery private-resident shipping permit to a small farm winery holding a small farm wine wholesale permit under §3-5-1602(c)(1)(E) issued on or before April 15, 2017, upon receipt of the following:

(A)

Proof that the winery produced by fermentation at least eight hundred gallons (800 gals.) of wine in the previous calendar year as shown on the winery's TTB F 5120-17; and

(B)

Payment of a licensing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

(b)(1)

In each subsequent year, the board may issue up to five (5) small farm winery private-resident shipping permits to small farm wineries licensed under §3-5-1602 and holding a small farm wine wholesale permit under §3-5-1602(c)(1)(E) issued after April 15, 2017, if the winery produced by fermentation at least eight hundred gallons (800 gals.) of wine in the previous calendar year as shown on the winery's TTB F 5120-17.

(2)

The board shall notify the public at large by legal notice and internet posting that the board will accept applications for small farm winery private-resident shipping permits.

(3)

The notice required under subdivision (b)(2) of this section shall include:

(A)

The number of permits to be issued;

(B)

The last date applications will be accepted; and

(C)

The date of a drawing to determine which applicants will be awarded a permit if the number of applicants exceeds the number of permits authorized by the board.

(4)

The board shall not accept an application more than ninety (90) days after the date of publication of the notice required under subdivision (b)(2) of this section.

(5)(A)

If the number of applicants for a permit exceeds the number of permits authorized by the board, the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall conduct a drawing not earlier than one hundred twenty (120) days after the publication of the notice specified in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, nor later than one hundred eighty (180) days after publication of the notice.

(B)(i)

On the date of the drawing, each applicant for a permit or his or her agent shall draw a number between one (1) and a number equal to the number of permits to be granted of applications filed.

(ii)

Position numbers shall not be transferred or assigned.

(6)

Upon payment of a licensing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), the director shall issue a permit to each eligible licensee that draws a number one (1) through the number authorized by the board for the drawing.

(c)

A small farm winery shall renew its small farm winery private-resident shipping permit each year with the division by paying a renewal fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History.

Acts 2017, No. 313, §
3; 2017, No. 848, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section is set out above as amended by Acts 2017, No. 848, § 1. This section was added by Acts 2017, No. 313, § 3, effective from March 1, 2017 until April 3, 2017, to read as follows:

“Permits — Drawing.

“(a)(1)

Within sixty (60) days after March 1, 2017, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall issue thirty (30) small farm winery private-resident shipping permits to ship small farm winery wine under §3-5-1709.

“(2)

In each subsequent year, the board may issue up to five (5) small farm winery private-resident shipping permits to ship small farm winery wine as provided in this section.

“(b)(1)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall notify the public at large by public notice that a drawing shall be held in Little Rock, Arkansas, to determine which of the small farm winery licensees holding a wine wholesale permit are eligible to receive a small farm winery private-resident shipping permit under this section.

“(2)

The public notice under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include without limitation:

“(A)

Internet notification; and

“(B)

Notice by mail to each licensee who holds both a small farm winery license and a wine wholesale permit under §3-5-1602.

“(c)(1)(A)

No later than fifteen (15) days before the scheduled drawing for the small farm winery private-resident shipping permit, a licensee holding both a small farm winery license and a wine wholesale permit who wishes to be entered into the drawing shall certify to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division that the winery has produced by fermentation at least one thousand gallons (1,000 gals.) of wine in the previous calendar year by providing the winery's TTB F 5120-17.

“(B)

A licensee that fails to submit proof of production by the date provided for in subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section is not eligible for the drawing under this section.

“(2)

On the date of the drawing, each licensee holding both a small farm winery license and wine wholesale permit who has met the requirements specified in subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall draw a number between one (1) and the number of eligible licensees.

“(3)

The drawing shall be conducted by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

“(4)

The individual of record with the division designated as the permit holder for the eligible small farm winery shall be present for the drawing at the location chosen by the director to be awarded a small farm winery private-resident shipping permit if selected by the drawing.

“(5)

Position numbers may not be assigned or transferred.

“(d)(1)

The director shall issue the small farm winery private-resident shipping permits authorized through the drawing under this section to those eligible licensees drawing numbers one (1) through thirty (30) upon payment of a licensing fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

“(2)

In a subsequent year, if the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board authorizes additional permits, the director shall issue permits authorized under this section to those eligible licensees drawing numbers one (1) through the number authorized by the board for the drawing upon payment of a licensing fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

“(e)

A small farm winery shall renew its small farm winery private-resident shipping permit each year with the division by paying a renewal fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 848 rewrote this section.

Subchapter 18

— Wine Sales in Grocery Stores

Effective Dates.

Acts 2017, No. 508, § 13(a): Oct. 1, 2017. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 1, 2, 3, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12 of this act become effective on October 1, 2017.”

3-5-1801. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Grocery store” means a single physical establishment that:

(A)

Has an inventory of human-consumable items; and

(B)

Is located in a wet territory;

(2)

“Slotting allowance” means an allowance paid by a manufacturer to a grocery store for making room for a product on the grocery store's shelves; and

(3)

“Wine” means port, wine, sherry wine, vermouth wine, or other wines manufactured within or without the State of Arkansas or hard cider, the alcoholic content of which does not exceed twenty-one percent (21%).

History.

Acts 2017, No. 508, § 6; 2019, No. 691, § 18.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “or hard cider” in (3).

3-5-1802. Grocery store wine permit — Fees.

(a)

A grocery store may apply to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board for a grocery store wine permit.

(b)(1)

A grocery store wine permit allows a permittee to purchase and sell wine and hard cider for off-premises consumption at a single location.

(2)

Wine and hard cider inventory orders or purchases, or both, shall be made only by a permittee for delivery to a single permitted location.

(3)

An order of wine and hard cider inventory for one location shall not be combined with an order for another location in a manner that would result in a cumulative discount or quantity discount, or both.

(c)

A grocery store seeking a grocery store wine permit shall meet the criteria for the holder of an off-premises retail beer permit in addition to the criteria established in this section.

(d)(1)

For the privilege of selling wine and hard cider in a grocery store, each grocery store shall pay a grocery store wine permit fee based on the size of the permitted building space.

(2)

The fee shall be:

(A)

One thousand dollars ($1,000) for a permitted building space containing less than thirty-five thousand one square feet (35,001 sq. ft.);

(B)

Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for a permitted building space containing between thirty-five thousand one square feet (35,001 sq. ft.) and fifty thousand square feet (50,000 sq. ft.);

(C)

Three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) for a permitted building space containing between fifty thousand one square feet (50,001 sq. ft.) and seventy-five thousand square feet (75,000 sq. ft.); and

(D)

Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a permitted building space containing more than seventy-five thousand square feet (75,000 sq. ft.).

(e)

One hundred percent (100%) of the fee shall be paid into the Arkansas Wine Grants Fund.

(f)

A grocery store wine permittee may conduct tasting events for educational and promotional purposes on the permittee's premises after obtaining a wine sampling permit from the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division under §3-5-104.

(g)(1)

A grocery store seeking a grocery store wine permit may derive no more than twenty percent (20%) of its gross sales from the sale of alcoholic beverages.

(2)

However, the requirement under subdivision (g)(1) of this section does not apply to an otherwise qualifying grocery store that, as of January 1, 2017, derives more than twenty percent (20%) of its gross sales from the sale of alcoholic beverages.

(h)

A grocery store wine permittee shall offer for sale small farm winery wine as defined in §3-5-1601 et seq.

(i)

A grocery store wine permit shall be available for issue only in a county in which the retail sale of alcohol under §3-4-604 was authorized as of January 1, 2017.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 508, § 6; 2019, No. 691, §§ 19, 20.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “and hard cider” throughout (b) and in (d)(1).

Cross References.

Arkansas Wine Grants Fund, §19-6-839.

3-5-1803. Slotting allowances prohibited.

(a)

Slotting allowances, as defined by 27 C.F.R. § 6.152(b), are prohibited.

(b)

A grocery store shall not require payment of a slotting allowance for products sold under this subchapter by a small farm winery, including without limitation:

(1)

Juice;

(2)

Low alcohol wine; and

(3)

Vinegar.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 508, § 6.

Subchapter 19

— Microbrewery-Restaurant Private Club Permit

3-5-1901. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Alcoholic beverage” means a beverage containing more than five-tenths percent (0.5%) of alcohol by weight;

(2)

“Barrel” means thirty-one gallons (31 gals.);

(3)

“Beer” means a fermented liquor made from malt or a substitute and having an alcoholic content not in excess of five percent (5%) by volume;

(4)

“Dry area” means an area in this state in which the manufacture or sale of beer is prohibited by a local option election held pursuant to applicable laws of this state;

(5)

“Malt beverage” means a liquor brewed from the fermented juices of grain and having an alcoholic content of at least five percent (5%) but not more than twenty-one percent (21%) by weight;

(6)

“Microbrewery” means a brewery that manufactures one (1) or more varieties of beer, malt beverage, or hard cider in an aggregate quantity not to exceed forty-five thousand (45,000) barrels per year from all facilities under common ownership with the microbrewery;

(7)

“Microbrewery-restaurant private club” means a nonprofit organization organized and existing under the laws of this state that:

(A)

Is both a microbrewery and a restaurant;

(B)

Has members, which are not directly or indirectly benefitted by the entity's net revenues;

(C)

Exists for some common recreational, social, patriotic, political, national, benevolent, athletic, community hospitality, professional association, entertainment, or other object or purpose other than the consumption of alcoholic beverages; and

(D)

Has existed for at least one (1) year; and

(8)

“Restaurant” means a public or private place that:

(A)

Is kept, used, maintained, advertised, and held out to the public or to a private or restricted membership as a place where complete meals are actually and regularly served;

(B)

Has adequate and sanitary kitchen and dining equipment;

(C)

Has seating capacity for at least fifty (50) people;

(D)

Has sufficient number and type of employees to prepare, cook, and serve suitable food for its guests or members;

(E)

Serves at least one (1) meal per day; and

(F)

Is open for business a minimum of five (5) days per week, with the exception of holidays, vacations, and periods of redecorating.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 681, § 1.

3-5-1902. Microbrewery-restaurant private club.

(a)

A microbrewery-restaurant private club applicant shall be an entity organized and existing under the laws of this state before applying for a microbrewery-restaurant private club permit as prescribed in this subchapter.

(b)

The net revenues of the microbrewery-restaurant private club shall not directly or indirectly benefit its members, except for the payment of bona fide expenses of the microbrewery-restaurant private club's operations.

(c)

Activities at the microbrewery-restaurant private club shall be conducted for some common recreational, social, patriotic, political, national, benevolent, athletic, community hospitality, professional association, entertainment, or other object or purpose and not solely for the consumption of alcoholic beverages.

(d)(1)

At the time of application for a microbrewery-restaurant private club permit, the entity shall own or lease, be the holder of a buy-sell agreement or offer and acceptance, or have an option to lease a building, property, or space for the reasonable comfort and accommodation of its members and the families and guests of its members.

(2)

The microbrewery-restaurant private club shall restrict the use of club facilities to its members and the families and guests of its members.

(e)

For purposes of this subchapter, a person is a member of the microbrewery-restaurant private club only upon ordering an alcoholic beverage as defined in §3-5-1901.

(f)

If the entity holding a microbrewery-restaurant private club permit additionally holds another alcoholic beverage permit, the hours of operation authorized for the microbrewery-restaurant private club apply to all permits of the entity.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 681, § 1.

3-5-1903. Microbrewery-restaurant private club — Procedure for obtaining permit.

(a)

A microbrewery-restaurant private club applicant may apply to obtain a microbrewery-restaurant private club through the procedures provided under §3-9-222.

(b)(1)

The application for a microbrewery-restaurant private club shall be submitted to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and accompanied by an annual permit fee of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(2)

In an area in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is not authorized by local option under §3-8-201 et seq., the application for a microbrewery-restaurant private club permit shall be accompanied by an additional application fee of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(c)(1)

After filing an acceptable application with the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, the applicant shall publish at least one (1) time each week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the city in which the premises are situated or, if the premises are not in a city, in a newspaper of general circulation for the locality where the business is to be conducted, a notice that the applicant has applied for a permit to dispense alcoholic beverages on the premises.

(2)

The notice shall be:

(A)

In such form as the director prescribes; and

(B)

Verified.

(3)

The notice shall list the name of the business owner and the managing agent, as applicable, and shall state:

(A)

That the manager, owner, at least one (1) partner, or the majority stockholder is a resident of Arkansas;

(B)

That he or she is of good moral character;

(C)

That he or she has never been convicted of a felony;

(D)

That he or she has never had a permit to sell or dispense alcoholic beverages revoked within the five (5) years preceding the date of the notice; and

(E)

That he or she has never been convicted of violating the laws of this state or of any other state governing the sale or dispensing of alcoholic beverages.

(d)(1)

Within five (5) days after filing an application for a permit to dispense alcoholic beverages on the premises, a notice of the application shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the entrance to the planned premises.

(2)

The applicant shall notify the director of the date when the notice is first posted.

(3)

A permit shall not be issued to an applicant until proper notice has been posted on the premises for at least thirty (30) consecutive days.

(4)

The notice shall be in such form as the director shall prescribe and shall be:

(A)

At least eleven inches (11") in width and seventeen inches (17") in height; and

(B)

Printed in black lettering on a yellow background.

(e)(1)

Upon receipt of an application for a permit and notification of the posted notice as required under subsection (d) of this section, the director shall immediately mail a copy of the application to the sheriff, chief of police, if located within a city, prosecuting attorney of the locality in which the premises are situated, and city board of directors or other governing body of the city in which the premises are located.

(2)

A permit shall not be issued by the director under this section until at least thirty (30) days have passed from the mailing of the notices required by this section.

(3)

If the director receives notification of an objection to the issuance of a permit from a governing official of the city or county within the thirty (30) days required under subdivision (d)(3) of this section, the director shall not issue the permit until he or she has held a public hearing.

(f)

The director may issue a permit as authorized in this section upon determination that the applicant is qualified and that the application is in the public interest.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 681, § 1.

3-5-1904. Permit — Scope — Restrictions.

(a)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may issue a microbrewery-restaurant private club permit that authorizes the permittee to:

(1)

Operate a microbrewery-restaurant private club and manufacture one (1) or more varieties of beer, malt beverage, or hard cider in an aggregate quantity not to exceed forty-five thousand (45,000) barrels per year from all facilities under common ownership with the microbrewery;

(2)(A)

Store beer, malt beverage, and hard cider manufactured by the microbrewery-restaurant private club and any other beer, malt beverage, and hard cider that the microbrewery-restaurant private club permittee may purchase from retailers and small brewers permitted by this state on the microbrewery-restaurant private club permitted premises and on the premises of the one (1) separate brewing facility of a microbrewery-restaurant private club authorized under subdivision (a)(8) of this section.

(B)

Two (2) or more microbrewery-restaurant private clubs sharing common ownership or a brewery of any size sharing common ownership with a microbrewery-restaurant private club shall be considered one (1) entity for purposes of:

(i)

Calculating barrel production; and

(ii)

The transportation of beer, malt beverage, or hard cider produced by one (1) entity among no more than three (3) microbrewery-restaurant private clubs of the one (1) entity;

(3)

Operate a restaurant that is the sales outlet for beer, malt beverage, or hard cider manufactured by the microbrewery-restaurant private club and that sells the beer, malt beverage, or hard cider and any other beer, malt beverage, hard cider, or wine that the microbrewery-restaurant private club permittee may purchase from retailers permitted by this state for consumption on the permitted premises or purchased directly from permitted small brewers allowed to distribute directly to the microbrewery-restaurant private club;

(4)

Sell on the premises beer, malt beverage, or hard cider manufactured by the microbrewery-restaurant private club or commonly owned facility to a member for on-premises consumption during legal operating hours;

(5)

Serve to a member on-premises complimentary samples of beer, malt beverages, or hard cider produced by the microbrewery-restaurant private club;

(6)

Sell beer, malt beverage, or hard cider of its own manufacture to a wholesale dealer permitted by this state for the purpose of resale to other retail permit holders under §§3-4-605 and3-5-101, dealing with wholesale distribution of beer, malt beverage, and hard cider;

(7)(A)

Conduct beer-tasting, malt beverage-tasting, and hard cider-tasting events for educational or promotional purposes at any location in wet areas of this state if:

(i)

A request for approval to conduct a beer-tasting, malt beverage-tasting, and hard cider-tasting event is received by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division at least two (2) weeks before the event;

(ii)

The request is approved by the division; and

(iii)

Written notice is given by the division to the permit holder at least five (5) days before the event.

(B)

The microbrewery-restaurant private club shall use only beer, malt beverage, and hard cider produced by the microbrewery-restaurant private club for an event approved under subdivision (a)(7)(A) of this section.

(C)

Subdivision (a)(7)(A) of this section does not authorize the conducting of a beer-tasting, malt beverage-tasting, and hard cider-tasting event at a separate brewing facility of a microbrewery-restaurant private club authorized under subdivision (a)(8) of this section; and

(8)(A)

Maintain one (1) separate brewing facility for the production or storage of beer, malt liquor, and hard cider as needed to meet demand, except that each facility used by the microbrewery-restaurant private club permittee shall not in the aggregate produce more than forty-five thousand (45,000) barrels of beer, malt beverage, and hard cider per year.

(B)

Beer, malt beverage, and hard cider produced by a separate brewing facility of a microbrewery-restaurant private club permittee shall be:

(i)

Sold to a permitted wholesaler; or

(ii)

Transported:

(a)

From the separate brewing facility to a microbrewery-restaurant private club commonly owned by the owner of the separate brewing facility for retail sale for consumption on the permitted premises; or

(b)

To the separate brewing facility from a microbrewery-restaurant private club commonly owned by the owner of the separate brewing facility for storage, production, or packaging.

(b)

The director may issue a microbrewery-restaurant private club permit if the microbrewery-restaurant private club premises are in a dry area and the governing body has approved an applicant under §3-5-1903.

(c)(1)

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section, after October 1, 2019, the director shall not issue a microbrewery-restaurant private club permit to a person or entity having more than five percent (5%) common ownership with a person or entity holding a permit under the Arkansas Small Brewery Act, §3-5-1401 et seq., or qualifying as a supplier under §3-5-1102.

(2)

The director may issue an additional microbrewery-restaurant private club permit after October 1, 2019, to a person or entity holding a microbrewery-restaurant private club permit as of October 1, 2019, and having more than five percent (5%) common ownership with a person or entity if the person or entity holds a permit under the Arkansas Small Brewery Act, §3-5-1401 et seq., or qualifies as a supplier under §3-5-1102.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 681, § 1.

3-5-1905. Microbrewery-restaurant private clubs — Sales prohibited.

(a)

A microbrewery-restaurant private club permitted under this subchapter shall not sell alcoholic beverages either by the package or by the drink to a:

(1)

Nonmember for on-premises or off-premises consumption; or

(2)

Member for off-premises consumption.

(b)

If a permittee sells, barters, loans, or gives away an alcoholic beverage in violation of this subchapter or other alcoholic beverage control laws of this state, the permit of the club shall be revoked.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 681, § 1.

3-5-1906. Fees and taxes.

A microbrewery-restaurant private club permittee shall:

(1)

Pay the applicable city or county permit fees and barrelage or taxes and shall pay a state permitting fee to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) per fiscal year to manufacture and sell to members its beer, malt beverages, and hard cider for consumption on the premises and to sell to members other beer, malt beverages, and hard cider purchased from a permitted wholesaler for consumption on the premises;

(2)

Measure beer, malt beverages, and hard cider manufactured by the microbrewery-restaurant private club, otherwise comply with applicable excise and enforcement tax determinations of the beer, malt beverages, and hard cider, and pay any applicable bond or deposit and the amount of the state excise tax and enforcement tax to this state, except the fees and taxes provided in §3-5-205, and as required by §§3-7-104 and3-7-111; and

(3)

Pay a tax at the rate of seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) per barrel, and proportionately for larger and smaller gallonages per barrel, on all beer, malt beverages, and hard cider in quantities of up to forty-five thousand (45,000) barrels per year produced and sold or offered for sale in the state.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 681, § 1.

3-5-1907. Microbrewery-restaurant private clubs — Reapplication for permit.

(a)

An entity that is denied upon application to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for a permit to operate as a microbrewery-restaurant private club in a dry territory may reapply by following the procedures stated in §3-5-1903 and the additional procedures provided for in subsection (b) of this section.

(b)(1)

If the applicant is reapplying within two (2) years from the date an application was denied by the director, the application shall be accompanied by certification from the county clerk of the county in which the microbrewery-restaurant private club is to be located certifying that the applicant obtained signatures from at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the registered voters in the county.

(2)

The application under this section shall be filed no later than twenty (20) days from the date that the county clerk certifies the petition.

(3)

The petition on which the signatures are obtained under this section shall state clearly that the purpose of the petition is to obtain an alcoholic beverage permit for a microbrewery-restaurant private club and to serve alcoholic beverages to members.

(4)

The person obtaining signatures shall verify the signatures by affidavit that shall be filed with the county clerk at the time of filing the petition for certification.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 681, § 1.

3-5-1908. Collection of taxes.

(a)

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall assess and collect delinquent state and local taxes from the owner or owners of the microbrewery-restaurant private club, file claims for unpaid taxes against bonds or other security required to be posted by the permittee, and enforce liens against assets held by the owner or owners.

(b)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may suspend or refuse to renew a permit held by a nonpartner if the microbrewery-restaurant private club owner fails to remit state or local taxes.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 681, § 1.

3-5-1909. Inspection of premises — Records of permitted premises and private clubs.

(a)

A permit shall not be issued under this subchapter unless the permittee has consented in writing that the permitted premises and its books and records are open at all times to all law enforcement and tax officials and officials of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division, and the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration without requirement of warrant or other legal process.

(b)

An entity holding a permit under this subchapter shall not market, sell, or otherwise furnish the names of its members or other information pertaining to its members to another public or private entity, except as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 681, § 1.